Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1046
911 service, defined.

911 service means the service a public safety answering point uses to receive and process 911 calls over a 911 service system.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1018;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 28.